Maryland, session 2026, HB0932.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
7–720.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2032, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL
COMPLETE CONSTRUCTION OF A FIFTH BUS DIVISION FACILITY.
(B) BEGINNING WITH THE FISCAL YEAR 2027 THROUGH 2033
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT AND THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL IDENTIFY THE FUNDING NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE
ADMINISTRATION’S FIFTH BUS DIVISION FACILITY IS IN OPERATION ON OR BEFORE
JUNE 30, 2032.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0932*

HOUSE BILL 932
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.